Nebraska, session 109, LB178.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB178 LB178
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 53-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
53-101 Sections 53-101 to 53-1,122 and sections 3 and 6 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Liquor Control Act.
Sec. 2. Section 53-103, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
53-103 For purposes of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act, the
definitions found in sections 53-103.01 to 53-103.52 and section 3 of
this act apply.
Sec. 3. Mandatory server alcohol training means a course or program
required pursuant to section 6 of this act for an individual engaged in
the sale, service, or mixture of alcoholic liquor, in providing security
for licensed premises or, in verifying customers' ages for purposes of
alcohol purchase or consumption. Such course or program shall include
education on (1) responsible beverage service practices to prevent
underage drinking and intoxication, (2) recognizing signs of
intoxication, (3) refusal of service to visibly intoxicated persons, (4)
identification and age verification, and (5) local alcohol laws.
Sec. 4. Section 53-117.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-117.03 (1) The On or before January 1, 2007, the commission shall
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing programs which
provide training for persons employed in the sale and service of
alcoholic liquor and management of licensed premises, including mandatory
server alcohol training. Such rules and regulations may include, but need
not be limited to:
(a) Minimum standards governing training of beverage servers or
individuals required to complete mandatory server alcohol training,
including standards and requirements governing curriculum, program
trainers, and certification requirements;
(b) Minimum standards governing training in management of licensed
-2-

LB178 LB178
2025 2025
premises, including standards and requirements governing curriculum,
program trainers, and certification requirements;
(c) Minimum standards governing the methods allowed for training
programs which may include the Internet, interactive video, live training
in various locations across the state, and other means deemed appropriate
by the commission;
(d) Methods for approving beverage-server training organizations and
programs, including mandatory server alcohol training programs. All such
beverage-server training programs approved by the commission shall issue
a certificate of completion to all persons who successfully complete the
program and shall provide the names of all persons completing the program
to the commission;
(e) Enrollment fees in an amount determined by the commission to be
necessary to cover the administrative costs, including salary and
benefits, of enrolling in a training program offered by the commission
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, but not to exceed thirty
dollars; and
(f) Procedures and fees for certification, which fees shall be in an
amount determined by the commission to be sufficient to defray the
administrative costs, including salary and benefits, associated with
maintaining a list of persons certified under this section and issuing
proof of certification to eligible individuals but shall not exceed
twenty dollars.
(2)(a) (2) The commission may create a program to provide training
for persons employed in the sale and service of alcoholic liquor and
management of licensed premises. The program shall include training on
the issues of sales and service of alcoholic liquor to minors and to
visibly inebriated purchasers. The commission may charge each person
enrolling in the program an enrollment fee as provided in the rules and
regulations, but such fee shall not exceed thirty dollars. All such fees
shall be collected by the commission and remitted to the State Treasurer
-3-

LB178 LB178
2025 2025
for credit to the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission Rule and Regulation
Cash Fund.
(b) The commission shall create a program to provide mandatory
server alcohol training under section 6 of this act. The commission may
charge each person enrolling in the program an enrollment fee as provided
in the rules and regulations, but such fee shall not exceed thirty
dollars. All such fees shall be collected by the commission and remitted
to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Liquor Control
Commission Rule and Regulation Cash Fund.
(3) A person who has completed a training program which complies
with the commission's rules and regulations, whether such program is
offered by the commission or by another organization, may become
certified by the commission upon the commission receiving evidence that
he or she has completed such program and the person seeking certification
paying the certification fee established under this section.
Sec. 5. Section 53-117.06, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
53-117.06 Any money collected by the commission pursuant to section
53-117.03, 53-117.05, 53-165.01, or 53-167.02 shall be credited to the
Nebraska Liquor Control Commission Rule and Regulation Cash Fund, which
fund is hereby created. The purpose of the fund shall be to cover any
administrative costs, including salary and benefits, incurred by the
commission in producing or distributing the material referred to in such
sections and to defray the costs associated with electronic regulatory
transactions, industry education events, enforcement training, and
equipment for regulatory work, and administering section 53-117.03 and
section 6 of this act. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General
Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Nebraska
Liquor Control Commission Rule and Regulation Cash Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
-4-

LB178 LB178
2025 2025
Investment Act.
Sec. 6. (1) Beginning January 1, 2026, a retail licensee shall only
employ a person to be engaged in the sale, service, or mixture of
alcoholic liquor, in providing security for licensed premises, or in
verifying a customer's age for purposes of alcohol purchase or
consumption if such person (a) has completed a mandatory server training
program approved by the commission and received a certification as
provided in section 53-117.03 or (b) completes a mandatory server
training program approved by the commission and receives a certification
as provided in section 53-117.03 within ninety days after the start of
such person's employment in such capacity.
(2) The retail licensee shall maintain on its licensed premises a
copy of each employee's required certificate or proof that such employee
has been employed for less than ninety days.
(3) Any retail licensee who employs a person in violation of this
section may have its license suspended, canceled, or revoked by the
commission.
Sec. 7. Original section 53-117.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 53-101, 53-103, and 53-117.06, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-5-